Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 5. Pedestrians’ Rights and Duties

§ 1051.
Pedestrians’ right of way in crosswalks.

If traffic-control signals are not in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way, slowing down or stopping if necessary, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within a crosswalk.

No pedestrian may suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle that is so close that it is impossible for a driver to yield.

If any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear may not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1985, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 1052.
Crossing except at crosswalks.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk shall yield the right of way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right of way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Between adjacent intersections at which traffic-control signals are in operation, pedestrians shall not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

No pedestrian may cross a roadway intersection diagonally unless authorized by official traffic control devices or an enforcement officer. When authorized to cross diagonally, pedestrians may cross only in accordance with the official traffic control devices or signal of an enforcement officer.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2003, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 1053.
Repealed. 2009, No. 114 (Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 1054.
Pedestrians to use right half of crosswalks.

Pedestrians may move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks only.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1055.
Pedestrians on roadways.

Where public sidewalks are provided, no person may walk along or upon an adjacent roadway.

Where public sidewalks are not provided, any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway shall, when practicable, walk only on the left side of the roadway or its shoulder facing the direction of possible oncoming traffic.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1056.
Highway solicitations.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person may stand within the roadway of a highway as defined in subdivision 4(32) of this title for the purpose of soliciting a ride, contributions, employment, or business from the occupant of any vehicle.

Not-for-profit and municipal organizations may solicit contributions on the roadway of a highway, other than limited access highways, provided that approval is granted by the local legislative body, and the legislative body ensures that there is in effect a policy of liability insurance providing adequate coverage for the municipality. Approval shall not be granted by the local legislative body if the proposed activities or location would, in the judgment of the legislative body, create a safety hazard or cause undue traffic congestion. No solicitations on the roadway may be done by any person under 16 years of age.

No person may stand within the portion of the highway right of way used for highway purposes for the purpose of soliciting the watching or guarding of any vehicle while parked or about to be parked on a street or highway.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1973, No. 20

, eff. March 7, 1973;

1989, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.).

§ 1057.
Duty toward persons who are blind.

Whenever a pedestrian is crossing or attempting to cross a public street or highway, guided by a guide dog or carrying in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick, white in color or white tipped with red, the driver of every vehicle approaching the intersection, or place where the pedestrian is attempting to cross, shall bring his or her vehicle to a full stop before arriving at the intersection or place of crossing and before proceeding shall take such precautions as may be necessary to avoid injuring the pedestrian.

It is unlawful for any person, unless totally or partially blind or otherwise having a severe visual disability, while on any public street or highway, to carry in a raised or extended position a cane or walking stick that is white in color or white tipped with red.

Nothing in this section deprives any person who is totally or partially blind or otherwise has a severe visual disability, not carrying a cane or walking stick and not being guided by a dog, of the rights and privileges conferred by law upon pedestrians crossing streets or highways, and the failure of any person who is totally or partially blind or otherwise has a severe visual disability to carry a cane or walking stick, or to be guided by a guide dog upon streets, highways, or sidewalks within this State, does not constitute and is not evidence of contributory negligence.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 146.

§ 1058.
Duties of pedestrians.

All pedestrians shall obey the instructions of all traffic control devices which are applicable to them, and all instructions of enforcement officers relating to control of traffic.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1059.
Driving through safety zone.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.